test/src/morphology/N-maa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - maa: # Noun 'borg' - full paradigm
     maa+N+Sg+Nom: maa
     maa+N+Sg+Gen: maan
     maa+N+Sg+Acc: maan
     maa+N+Sg+Par: maata
     maa+N+Sg+Tra: maaksi
     maa+N+Sg+Abe: maatta
     maa+N+Sg+Com: maain
     maa+N+Sg+Ine: maassa
     maa+N+Sg+Ela: maasta
     maa+N+Sg+Ill: maahan
     maa+N+Sg+Ade: maala
     maa+N+Sg+Abl: maalta
     maa+N+Sg+All: maale
     maa+N+Sg+Ess: maana
     maa+N+Pl+Nom: maat
     maa+N+Pl+Gen: maitten
     maa+N+Pl+Acc: maita
     maa+N+Pl+Par: maita
     maa+N+Pl+Tra: maiksi
     maa+N+Pl+Abe: maitta
     maa+N+Pl+Com: main
     maa+N+Pl+Ine: maissa
     maa+N+Pl+Ela: maista
     maa+N+Pl+Ill: maihin
     maa+N+Pl+Ade: maila
     maa+N+Pl+Abl: mailta
     maa+N+Pl+All: maile
     maa+N+Pl+Ess: maina
